Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF510.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; MADE IN MINNESOTA PROGRAM.new text end new text begin $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to Enterprise Minnesota, Inc., to directly invest in Minnesota manufacturers under the Made in Minnesota program under Minnesota Statutes, section 116O.115. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; ENTERPRISE MINNESOTA, INC.new text end new text begin (a) $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to Enterprise Minnesota, Inc., to reach and deliver talent, leadership, employee retention, continuous improvement, strategy, quality management systems, revenue growth, and manufacturing peer-to-peer advisory services to small manufacturing companies employing 250 or fewer full-time equivalent employees. new text end new text begin (b) No later than February 1, 2026, and February 1, 2027, Enterprise Minnesota, Inc., must provide a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over economic development that includes: new text end new text begin (1) the amount of money awarded during the past 12 months; new text end new text begin (2) the estimated financial impact of the money awarded to each company receiving service under the program; new text end new text begin (3) the actual financial impact of the money awarded during the past 24 months; and new text end new text begin (4) the total amount of federal money leveraged from the Manufacturing Extension Partnership at the United States Department of Commerce. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin REVISOR INSTRUCTION.new text end new text begin The revisor of statutes shall change the term "small business growth acceleration program" to "Made in Minnesota program" wherever it appears in Minnesota Statutes, section 116O.115. new text end